District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-301.11

Modification of redevelopment plans.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 798, ch. 736, § 12
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1104, Pub. L. 85-854, § 1(14)
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-811.
1973 Ed., § 5-711.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Resolutions

Resolution 14-17, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective January 23, 2001.

Resolution 14-155, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Shaw School Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective July 10, 2001.

Editor's Notes

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for Shaw School Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-197, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Shaw School Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 1983,” effective June 7, 1983, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Shaw Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on August 5, 1982.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for Downtown Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-255, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 1983,” effective July 5, 1983, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on May 5, 1983.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for 14th Street Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-256, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 1983,” effective July 5, 1983, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on July 1, 1982.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1 approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-257, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, Modification Approval Resolution of 1983,” effective July 5, 1983, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on May 6, 1982.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for H Street Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 5-570, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the H Street Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 1984,” effective February 28, 1984, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the H Street Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on August 4, 1983.

Pursuant to Resolution 6-320, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the H Street Urban Renewal Area First Modification Approval Resolution of 1985,” effective October 8, 1985, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the H Street Urban Renewal Area as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on May 2, 1985.

Modifications to Urban Renewal Plan for Shaw School Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 6-327, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Shaw School Urban Renewal Area First Modification Approval Resolution of 1985,” effective October 8, 1985, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Shaw School Urban Renewal Area as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on May 30, 1985.

Modification of Urban Renewal Plan for Fort Lincoln Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 6-418, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Fort Lincoln Urban Renewal Area Second Modification Approval Resolution of 1985,” effective November 5, 1985, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Fort Lincoln Urban Renewal Area, located in Ward 5, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on January 10, 1985.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for Southwest Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 6-680, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C-1, First Modifications Approval Resolution of 1986,” effective May 27, 1986, the Council approved the modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on February 6, 1986.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1 approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-226, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective March 15, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on November 5, 1987.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-273 the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective June 14, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on January 7, 1988.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-274, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective June 14, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on January 7, 1988.

Modification of Urban Renewal Plan for 14th Street Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-353, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective November 29, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on April 4, 1985.

Modification of Urban Renewal Plan for Downtown Urban Renewal Area approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-354, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective November 29, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Renewal Area, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on October 1, 1986.

Modifications of Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, approved: Pursuant to Resolution 7-364, the “Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1988”, effective November 29, 1988, the Council approved the proposed modifications of the Urban Renewal Plan for the southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission on November 4, 1987.

Modification of Urban Renewal Plan for Northeast Urban Area, Project No. 1, located in Ward 2, approved: Pursuant to Resolution 8-100 the ‘Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1989‘, effective October 10, 1989, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Northeast Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Urban Renewal Plan for the Northwest Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 9-184, effective February 14, 1992, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Northwest Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Renewal Plan for the Northwest Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, Second Modification Approval Resolution of 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 9-321, effective July 24, 1992, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Northwest Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Urban Renewal Plan for the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area (“Project Area”), First Modification Approval Resolution of 1993: Pursuant to Resolution 10-209, effective December 17, 1993, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area, located in Ward 1 as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Resolution 10-386, effective June 21, 1994, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, Project No. 1, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project “C”, Second Modification Approval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Resolution 10-470, effective December 6, 1994, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project “C”, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project “C”, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Resolution 10-472, effective December 6, 1994, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project “C”, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission. Section 3(c) of Resolution 10-472 was amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 11-110.

Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, First Modification Approval Resolution of 1995: Pursuant to Resolution 11-123, effective July 29, 1995, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, Second Modification Approval Resolution of 1995: Pursuant to Resolution 11-142, effective October 10, 1995, the Council approved modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, located in Ward 2, as adopted by the National Capital Planning Commission.

Renewal Plan for the Fourteenth Street Urban Renewal Area Modification Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-671, effective July 30, 1998, the Council approved the modifications to the Urban Renewal Plan for the Fourteenth Street Urban Renewal Area.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(122) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.